Hawaii statutes.
§514B-34 Condominium map; certification of
architect, engineer, or surveyor. (a) The condominium map shall bear the
statement of a licensed architect, engineer, or surveyor certifying that the
condominium map is consistent with the plans of the condominium's building or
buildings filed or to be filed with the government official having jurisdiction
over the issuance of permits for the construction of buildings in the county in
which the condominium property regime is located. If the building or buildings
have been built at the time the condominium map is recorded, the certification
shall state that, to the best of the architect's, engineer's, or surveyor's
knowledge, the condominium map depicts the layout, location, dimensions, and
numbers of the units substantially as built. If the building or buildings, or
portions thereof, have not been built at the time the condominium map is
recorded, within thirty days from the completion of construction, the developer
shall execute and record an amendment to the declaration accompanied by a
certification of a licensed architect, engineer, or surveyor certifying that
the condominium map previously recorded, as amended by the revised pages filed
with the amendment, if any, fully and accurately depicts the layout, location,
boundaries, dimensions, and numbers of the units substantially as built.

(b) If the condominium property regime is a
conversion and the government official having jurisdiction over the issuance of
permits for the construction of buildings in the county in which the
condominium property regime is located is unable to locate the original
permitted construction plans, the certification need only state that the
condominium map depicts the layout, location, boundaries, dimensions, and
numbers of the units substantially as built. If there are no buildings, no
certification shall be required. [L 2005, c 93, pt of §2; am L 2006, c 273, §9]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next